District of Columbia statutes.
3-208

Repealed

Wilful neglect, refusal, or failure to perform duties.

Repealed.

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 175, ch. 638, § 8
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154,§ 2, 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 2-1408.
1973 Ed., § 2-208.